Utah statutes.
17-50-101.   Definitions.

As used in this title:

(1)  "County" means a unit of local government that is a body corporate and politic and a legal subdivision of the state, with geographic boundaries as described in Section 17-50-104, and powers as provided in Part 3, County Powers.

(2)  "Executive," when used to describe the powers, duties, or functions of a person or body elected as the county executive or a person appointed as the county manager or administrative officer, refers to:

(a)  the power and duty to carry laws and ordinances into effect and secure their due observance; and

(b)  those powers, duties, and functions that, under constitutional and statutory provisions and through long usage and accepted practice and custom at the federal and state level, have come to be regarded as belonging to the executive branch of government.

(3)  "Legislative," when used to describe the powers, duties, or functions of a county commission or council, refers to:

(a)  the power and duty to enact ordinances, levy taxes, and establish budgets; and

(b)  those powers, duties, and functions that, under constitutional and statutory provisions and through long usage and accepted practice and custom at the federal and state level, have come to be regarded as belonging to the legislative branch of government.



Amended by Chapter 46, 2006 General Session

